Nebraska, session 109, LB724.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB724 LB724
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 2. The Division of Behavioral Health of the Department of
Health and Human Services and the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care
of the Department of Health and Human Services shall conduct a cost study
of behavioral health rates in Nebraska. The cost study shall compare the
costs of providing services compared to current rates paid for such
services in the regional behavioral health system and the medical
assistance program. The report shall be completed no later than September
1, 2026, and a final report shall be submitted electronically to the
Clerk of the Legislature on or before December 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Original section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-